Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-102, as
last amended by Section 36, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-102), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-102. A. A nonresident who is sixteen (16) years of
age or older may operate a motor vehicle in this state as authorized
by the class, restrictions, and endorsements specified on the
license, if the nonresident is:
1. Properly licensed in the home state or country to operate a
commercial or noncommercial motor vehicle and who has immediate
possession of a valid driver license issued by the home state or
country; or
2. A member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the
spouse or dependent of such member who has been issued and is in
possession of a valid driver license issued by an overseas component
of the Armed Forces of the United States.

B. A resident who is at least fifteen (15) years of age may
operate a vehicle in this state without a driver license, if the
resident is:
1. Operating a vehicle pursuant to subsection B of Section 6-
105 of this title; or
2. Taking the driving skills examination as required by Section
6-110 of this title, when accompanied by a Driver License Examiner
of Service Oklahoma or by a designated examiner approved and
certified by Service Oklahoma.
C. Any person, while in the performance of official duties, may
operate any class of motor vehicle if the person possesses any class
of valid Oklahoma driver license or a valid driver license issued by
another state, if the person is:
1. A member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is on
active duty;
2. A member of the military reserves, not including United
States reserve technicians;
3. A member of the National Guard who is on active duty
including National Guard military technicians;
4. A member of the National Guard who is on part-time National
Guard training including National Guard military technicians; or
5. A member of the United States Coast Guard who is on active
duty.
D. 1. The Director of Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
adopt rules as may be necessary to enter into reciprocity agreements
with foreign countries. The rules shall specify that the driver
license standards of the foreign country shall be comparable to
those of this state. The rules shall also require foreign drivers,
who are operating a motor vehicle in Oklahoma under such a
reciprocity agreement, to comply with the compulsory motor vehicle
liability insurance and financial responsibility laws of this state.
2. Service Oklahoma shall enter into a reciprocity agreement
for driver licenses with the country of Ireland.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2297 Page 2

E. When an automated driving system, as defined by Section 1701
of this title, installed on a motor vehicle is engaged, the
following shall apply:
1. The automated driving system is considered the driver or
operator, for the purpose of assessing compliance with applicable
traffic or motor vehicle laws, and shall be deemed to satisfy
electronically all physical acts required by a driver or operator of
the vehicle; and
2. The automated driving system is considered to be licensed to
operate the vehicle.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2297 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 17th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2297 Page 4